Utah statutes.
53A-1-1112.   Reporting.

(1)  For the 2012-13 school year and thereafter, the State Board of Education, in collaboration with school districts and charter schools, shall annually develop a school report card and a personal student achievement report for each public school student to be delivered to parents of students in public schools.

(2)  The school report card shall include:

(a)  the school's grade;

(b)  the percentage of the maximum number of points that may be earned; and

(c)  information indicating the school's performance on the various criteria upon which the grade is based.

(3)  The personal student achievement report shall include:

(a)  information on a student's level of proficiency as measured by a statewide assessment; and

(b)  a comparison of a student's expected learning growth and actual learning growth in a subject as measured by a statewide assessment.

(4)  A school report card and personal student achievement report shall be delivered to the parent or guardian of each student either electronically or by mail.

(5)  On or before September 1, the State Board of Education shall annually publish, on the State Board of Education's website, a report card for each school with the information required in Subsection (2).

(6)  On or before September 1, a school district shall annually publish on the school district's website, and a school's website, a school report card with the grade for the prior school year, together with the current school improvement plan established in accordance with Section 53A-1a-108.5.

(7)  On or before September 1, a charter school shall annually publish on the charter school's website a school report card with the grade for the prior school year.



Amended by Chapter 478, 2013 General Session

